incubator/apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiemdviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juodviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jųdviejų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jodviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedvi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jodviem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiedviese</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plural -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mes</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mūsų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mums</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mumis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mumyse</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jūsų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jums</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jumis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jumyse</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiems</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juose</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joms</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomis</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jose</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Second declension -->
    <pardef n="abit/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ui</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ams</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uose</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>asna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aerodromas"><i>aerodrom</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akmenukas"><i>akmenuk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alpinistas"><i>alpinist</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anglosaksas"><i>anglosaks</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apčiuopiamumas"><i>apčiuopiamum</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apsaugininkas"><i>apsauginink</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arklas"><i>arkl</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aspirinas"><i>aspirin</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atšvaitas"><i>atšvait</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autobusiukas"><i>autobusiuk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ąžuolas"><i>ąžuol</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balkonas"><i>balkon</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barokas"><i>barok</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berniukas"><i>berniuk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blaškymas"><i>blaškym</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brazilas"><i>brazil</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čečėnas"><i>čečėn</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chirurgas"><i>chirurg</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dailininkas"><i>dailinink</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="debiutas"><i>debiut</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demokratas"><i>demokrat</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diapazonas"><i>diapazon</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diskomfortas"><i>diskomfort</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dopingas"><i>doping</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="durpynas"><i>durpyn</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="džinsas"><i>džins</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eksperimentas"><i>eksperiment</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eliksyras"><i>eliksyr</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etapas"><i>etap</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fasadas"><i>fasad</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotografas"><i>fotograf</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garantas"><i>garant</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gimstamumas"><i>gimstamum</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grūdas"><i>grūd</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imunodeficitas"><i>imunodeficit</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="išbaigtumas"><i>išbaigtum</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jubiliatas"><i>jubiliat</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kambariokas"><i>kambariok</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karklas"><i>karkl</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keltuvas"><i>keltuv</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klerkas"><i>klerk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompleksas"><i>kompleks</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kooperatyvas"><i>kooperatyv</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kulnas"><i>kuln</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laiškas"><i>laišk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liberalas"><i>liberal</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="magistrantas"><i>magistrant</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mašinistas"><i>mašinist</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metalistas"><i>metalist</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mistikas"><i>mistik</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muzikantas"><i>muzikant</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nitratas"><i>nitrat</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="organas"><i>organ</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pamatas"><i>pamat</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patalas"><i>patal</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pergamentas"><i>pergament</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pirmininkas"><i>pirminink</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pomidoras"><i>pomidor</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prestižas"><i>prestiž</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="projektas"><i>projekt</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="racionas"><i>racion</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reglamentas"><i>reglament</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="riksmas"><i>riksm</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saitas"><i>sait</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sąvartynas"><i>sąvartyn</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šeštokas"><i>šeštok</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skaitliukas"><i>skaitliuk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šlakas"><i>šlak</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solidas"><i>solid</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štampas"><i>štamp</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stulpas"><i>stulp</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svogūnas"><i>svogūn</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telefaksas"><i>telefaks</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tikėtinumas"><i>tikėtinum</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tranzitas"><i>tranzit</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvaikas"><i>tvaik</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vagoniukas"><i>vagoniuk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaškas"><i>vašk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viesulas"><i>viesul</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žąstas"><i>žąst</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žvirbliukas"><i>žvirbliuk</i><par n="abit/as__n"/></e>
